Tennessee statutes. Title 30 Administration of Estates
Part 6

Accounts and Settlements

30-2-601. Accountings — Statement in lieu of accounting.

Within fifteen (15) months from the date of qualification, the personal representative shall make an accounting with the clerk of the court exercising probate jurisdiction in the county of the estate. If accountings have been waived by the decedent's will or other pleadings filed with the court, the personal representative shall not be required to file a detailed accounting but shall be required to file a status report detailing any remaining estate issues within fifteen (15) months from the date of qualification and each year thereafter that the estate remains open. Upon application of one (1) or more of the distributees of the residue, the court may require the personal representative to file a detailed accounting with the court.

After the first accounting and until the estate is fully administered, the personal representative shall make further accountings annually from the date of the first accounting. The accountings shall state all receipts, disbursements and distributions of principal and income for the accounting period and the remaining assets held in the estate and shall be verified by the oath of the personal representative before the clerk or any person authorized by law to administer oaths in such cases.

The final accounting shall state the personal representative has mailed or delivered notice of the requirement to file claims required by § 30-2-306(d) to the creditors of the decedent who were known to or reasonably ascertainable by the personal representative.

For good cause shown to the court, it may extend the time for filing the accountings. However, detailed accountings of solvent estates may be waived if:

The decedent by the decedent's will waived the requirement for the personal representative to make court accountings of the estate; or

All of the distributees of the residue file with the clerk of the court sworn waivers, or statements under penalty of perjury, excusing the personal representative from filing all court accountings.

If all court accountings are waived by the decedent's will or by the distributees as above provided and notwithstanding any other provisions of probate law to the contrary, the personal representative and the distributees of the residue of a solvent estate, in which all legitimate claims against the estate have been satisfied, may file separate statements with the clerk of the court at any time after the period for creditors to file claims against the estate has expired, which statement by the personal representative shall state substantially the facts in subdivision (b)(1)(A) and which statement by the distributees of the residue shall state substantially the facts in subdivision (b)(1)(B); except that no statement acknowledging receipt shall be required of a distributee who is also the personal representative:

That the personal representative has properly administered the estate, has paid or settled all claims that were lawfully presented, has paid all expenses of administration, has mailed or delivered notice of the requirement to file claims, as prescribed in § 30-2-306(d), to the creditors of the decedent who were known to or reasonably ascertainable by the personal representative, has for estates where the death occurred prior to January 1, 2016, filed with the court a final receipt from the department of revenue unless waived pursuant to § 67-8-409(g), has distributed the estate according to the will and obtained and filed receipts for specific bequests as required by § 30-2-707, or has distributed the estate according to the laws of intestate succession; and

That the distributees of the residue acknowledge that the estate has been properly distributed to them.

If the personal representative has made diligent efforts, satisfactory to the court, to obtain an acknowledgement from any distributee, and one (1) or more have failed to comply, the personal representative may move the court for closure of the estate by giving notice of the pending settlement to the non-compliant distributee. Failure of the non-compliant distributee to appear or participate in the hearing shall result in a final order closing the estate.

The filing of this statement, and without the requirement of notice of an accounting by the clerk, relieves the personal representative and all distributees of any requirement of law or rule to file a detailed statement, accounting or receipt of any property, money or other items received from the estate. This section does not apply unless all distributees of the residue of an estate file this statement in lieu of a more detailed accounting that may otherwise be required.

In connection with any final settlement with the court, it is necessary for the receipt of any legatee or distributee to be executed under penalty of perjury or otherwise sworn before the clerk or a notary public, in a form developed by the administrative office of the courts. The form shall be posted on the website of the administrative office of the courts where it can be copied by the legatee or distributee or provided to the legatee or distributee by the court or the court clerk.

In connection with any accounting, to support the financial information reported, the personal representative shall submit with the accounting the original of each cancelled check written on the estate account unless:

The personal representative is a bank to which § 45-2-1003(c) applies or a savings and loan association to which § 45-2-1003(c) would apply if the savings and loan association were a bank, in which case the personal representative shall comply with § 45-2-1003(c); or

The estate account is maintained in a financial institution, as defined in § 34-1-101, that does not return the cancelled checks but provides a printed statement showing the date the check cleared, the payee and the amount, in which case the personal representative shall submit a printed statement from the financial institution.

Code 1858, §§ 2295, 2296 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 125, § 1); Shan., §§ 4031, 4032; Code 1932, §§ 8244, 8245; Acts 1972, ch. 464, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-1101, 30-1102; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 19; 1986, ch. 580, § 1; 1989, ch. 395, §§ 10-12; 1992, ch. 951, § 7; 1995, ch. 177, § 1; 1997, ch. 426, § 11; 1998, ch. 762, § 1; 1999, ch. 491, § 12; 2016, ch. 809, §§ 1-3; 2017, ch. 280, §§ 1-4.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 280, § 3 added (b)(3); however, that subsection was added as (b)(2), and related redesignations were made in subsection (b) by authority of the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that the amendments to this section by that act shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998, and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment substituted “sworn waivers, or statements under penalty of perjury, excusing” for “waivers excusing” in (a)(4)(B); substituted “has, for estates where the death occurred prior to January 1, 2016, filed with the court a final receipt from the department of revenue unless waived pursuant to § 67-8-409(9),” for “has filed with the clerk of the court exercising probate jurisdiction the final receipt and release from the department of revenue evidencing payment of all state inheritance and/or estate tax due from the estate, unless waived pursuant to § 67-8-409(9),” in (b)(1); and added “Except as provided in subdivision (a)(4)(B),” at the beginning of (d).

The 2017 amendment added the last two sentences of (a)(1); inserted “as required by § 30-2-707” near the end of (b)(1)(A); added (b)(2); and rewrote (d) which read: “Except as provided in subdivision (a)(4)(B), in connection with any accounting, it is not necessary for the receipt or voucher of any legatee or distributee to be sworn or otherwise acknowledged before the clerk or a notary public.”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 809, § 8. April 14, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 280, § 8. July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Duties of clerk, § 18-6-106.

Fees of clerks of courts administering probate matters, §§ 8-21-401, 8-21-701, 8-21-702.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, chapter 16, part 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 836, 837, 1144.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-1310, 4-1311, 4-1313, 4-1315.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Compromise and Settlement, § 2; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, §§ 63, 65, 66, 75; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 168.

30-2-602. Citation to appear and settle — Punishment for disobedience.

If any personal representative fails to settle the accounts or file a status report as prescribed in § 30-2-601, the clerk shall cite the personal representative to appear and settle on a given day, to be specified in the citation, and if the personal representative disobeys the citation, the citation being duly returned, with service endorsed on it, or endorsement to the effect that the personal representative avoids service, that disobedience or avoiding of service shall be a contempt of court, and punishable as such. At the clerk's discretion, any citation issued for the appearance of a personal representative pursuant to this section may be served by sending such citation by certified mail with return receipt to the personal representative's last known address.

Code 1858, § 2297 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 215, § 6); Shan., § 4033; Code 1932, § 8246; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1103; Acts 1989, ch. 395, § 13; 2017, ch. 280, § 5.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment inserted “or file a status report” in the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 280, § 8. July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Failure to settle accounts, § 30-2-613.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 667, 838.

30-2-603. Service of notice of accounting.

No account of any personal representative shall be taken until the clerk of the probate or chancery court, taking the account, or the personal representative or the personal representative's attorney has served the parties interested with notice of taking the account at least five (5) days before the time fixed for taking the account. This notice may be waived in writing by any legatee, distributee or other person interested in the estate.

If addresses of heirs, distributees, or other persons interested in the estate are unknown, the personal representative or the personal representative's attorney shall publish notice of the accounting in a newspaper of general circulation in the county with jurisdiction over the probate proceedings.

Code 1858, § 2298 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 215, § 2); Shan., § 4034; mod. Code 1932, § 8247; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1104; Acts 1986, ch. 580, § 2; 1997, ch. 407, § 2; 2001, ch. 400, § 2.

Cross-References. Clerk to serve notice of accounts, § 18-6-106.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 839, 846, 1123, 1144.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-1309.

30-2-604. Examination of representative under oath.

The clerk or commissioner may, and, when it seems to the clerk or commissioner necessary, shall examine the accounting party, upon oath, touching the representative's receipts and disbursements.

Code 1858, § 2299 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 125, § 4); Shan., § 4035; Code 1932, § 8248; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1105.

Cross-References. Clerk to examine accounting party, § 18-6-106.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 840.

30-2-605. Continuance of settlement.

On sufficient cause shown by affidavit, the clerk may continue the settlement from time to time.

Code 1858, § 2300 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 125, § 3); Shan., § 4036; Code 1932, § 8249; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1106.

Cross-References. Clerk continuing settlement, § 18-6-106.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 838, 840, 1115.

30-2-606. Charges, disbursements, and compensation credited to accounting party.

The clerk shall charge every accounting party with all sums of money the accounting party has received, or might have received by using due and reasonable diligence, and shall credit the accounting party with a reasonable compensation for services, and with disbursements supported by lawful vouchers.

Code 1858, § 2301 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 111, § 15; 1837-1838, ch. 125, § 4); Shan., § 4037; Code 1932, § 8250; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1107.

Cross-References. Administrator as trustee for children's allowance, § 30-2-105.

Clerk charging and crediting party, § 18-6-106.

Public administrators and public guardians, compensation, § 30-1-407.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 840, 841, 878, 1144.

Attorney General Opinions. Law clerk and paralegal fees in awards of expenses for administering a decedent's estate, OAG 92-56, 1992 Tenn. AG LEXIS 54 (10/6/92).

30-2-607. Exceptions to account — Appeal from decision of clerk.

Any person interested in the estate may except to the account within a thirty-day period after it has been stated by the clerk, and, if dissatisfied with the clerk's decision on the exceptions, may within an additional thirty-day period appeal to the court. The clerk shall, within five (5) days after the filing of exceptions to the clerk's decision, mail copies of the exceptions to the personal representative and the personal representative's attorney of record.

Code 1858, § 2302 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 215, § 3); Shan., § 4038; Code 1932, § 8251; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1108; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 20.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 845.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-1316.

Collateral References.

Appeal without bond by executor or administrator from order, decree or judgment affecting his account. 104 A.L.R. 1195.

Consul, right of, to institute or participate in accounting proceedings. 157 A.L.R. 116.

30-2-608. Incomplete inventory.

Any person interested in any deceased person's estate as legatee, distributee, surviving spouse, creditor, or otherwise, may, at any time before final settlement of the estate, show by proof that the personal representative has not returned a complete inventory, and the article or articles omitted in the inventory shall be debited to the personal representative at the value of the article or articles, unless the personal representative can show a sufficient reason for leaving the article or articles out of the inventory.

Code 1858, § 2303 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 215, § 1); Shan., § 4039; mod. Code 1932, § 8252; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1109.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 665, 666, 839, 845.

Law Reviews.

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1101 (1960).

30-2-609. Appeal from judgment of court.

In any county having a population of five hundred thousand (500,000) or more according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, when the court having probate jurisdiction finally settles an account, any person adversely affected by the settlement may appeal from the judgment to the court of appeals.

In any county having a population of less than five hundred thousand (500,000) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, when the court having probate jurisdiction finally settles an account:

If the judge serving such court is the circuit court judge or chancellor of the judicial district, then any person adversely affected by the settlement may appeal from the judgment to the court of appeals; or

If the judge serving such court is not the circuit court judge or chancellor of the judicial district, then any person adversely affected by the settlement may appeal from the judgment to the appropriate trial court of general jurisdiction in which case the trial judge shall hear the matter de novo.

Except in any county having a population of five hundred thousand (500,000) or more according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the appeal of any decision, ruling, order, or judgment of a probate court that is served by a judge who is not the circuit court judge or chancellor of the judicial district in which the matter arose shall be to the appropriate trial court of general jurisdiction in which case the trial judge shall hear the matter de novo.

The appeal of any decision, ruling, order, or judgment of a probate court that is served by the circuit court judge or chancellor of the judicial district in which the matter arose (or of a probate court in any county having a population of five hundred thousand (500,000) or more according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census), shall be to the court of appeals as otherwise provided by law or rule of court.

Subdivision (b)(2) and subsection (c) shall not apply in counties having a population of:

not less than nor more than

39,050 39,150

44,200 44,300

71,100 71,200

88,800 88,900

105,800 105,900

according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

In any county set out in subdivision (e)(1), any person adversely affected by the settlement or any decision, ruling, order, or judgment of the probate court shall appeal to the court of appeals unless otherwise prohibited by law or rule of court.

Code 1858, § 2304 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 215, § 4); Shan., § 4040; Code 1932, § 8253; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1110; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 21; 2002, ch. 754, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 157, § 1; 2009, ch. 396, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 845.

Law Reviews.

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1101 (1960).

30-2-610. Settlement prima facie evidence when recorded.

The settlement, when so made, and recorded, shall be prima facie evidence in favor of the accounting party.

Code 1858, § 2305 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 125, § 5); Shan., § 4041; Code 1932, § 8254; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1111.

Cross-References. Clerk to record settlements, § 18-6-106.

Settlements prima facie correct, § 24-5-102.

30-2-611. Fees of clerk.

Besides the fees allowed to the clerk for the clerk's service, as provided in former § 8-21-701(28)-(30) (repealed) for taking and stating accounts, the clerk shall receive such further sum as the court of first instance or on appeal may allow, upon a confirmation of the settlement.

Code 1858, § 2306 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 125, § 6); Shan., § 4042; mod. Code 1932, § 8255; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1112.

Compiler's Notes. Section 8-21-701(28)-(30), referred to in this section, were repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 924, § 1, which rewrote § 8-21-701, effective July 1, 2008.

30-2-612. Balance payable to clerk's office — Award of execution.

After the settlement of any administrator's or executor's account, the probate court may compel the personal representative to pay into the office of the clerk the balance found against the personal representative, and may, on motion of the clerk or any surviving spouse, distributee, or legatee, after twenty (20) days' notice to the personal representative, award summarily an execution against the representative and the personal representative's sureties for the amount of the balance, as in case of a judgment at law, and when any specific thing is to be done, the probate court may compel the representative, by an order, to perform it, and by process of contempt in case of refusal.

Code 1858, § 2307; Acts 1871, ch. 51, § 1; Shan., § 4043; Code 1932, § 8256; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1113.

Cross-References. Suit for distributive share or legacy, § 30-2-710.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 847.

30-2-613. Failure to settle accounts — Indictment — Penalty.

No executor or administrator shall neglect or refuse, for thirty (30) days after service of a subpoena, to appear before the clerk of the probate court and settle the accounts.

The clerk of the probate court shall return to the clerk of the circuit or criminal court, on or before the first day of every term of the court, having jurisdiction, a list of delinquent executors and administrators, and the district attorney general shall, ex officio, prefer against each of them an indictment without a prosecutor.

Upon conviction of this offense, upon indictment or presentment in the circuit or criminal court, the delinquent shall be fined not less than one dollar ($1.00) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

Code 1858, §§ 2308-2310 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 125, § 3); Shan., §§ 4044-4046; Code 1932, §§ 8257-8259; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-1114 — 30-1116.

Cross-References. Disobedience of citation to appear and settle, § 30-2-602.

Duties of clerk of county court when report is delinquent, § 18-6-106.

Failure to settle accounts indictable without prosecutor, § 40-13-104.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 838.

Law Reviews.

Where There's a Will: Charles Kuralt: On the Road to Taxation (Dan W. Holbrook), 39 No. 8 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2003).

30-2-614. Proration of federal estate taxes and Tennessee inheritance or estate taxes.

For the purposes of this section, “persons interested in the estate” means all persons who may be entitled to receive, or who have received, any property or interest that is required to be included in the gross estate of a decedent, or any benefit whatsoever with respect to any such property or interest, whether under a will, or intestacy, or by reason of any transfers, trust, estate, interest, right, power, relinquishment of power, gift in contemplation of death, gift taking effect in possession or enjoyment at or after death, or any other transfer inter vivos that is subject to federal death taxes, or the proceeds of any insurance policies that are subject to federal death taxes.

Whenever the personal representative of an estate has paid an estate or death tax to the government of the United States under any federal tax law now in effect or hereafter enacted by congress, upon, or with respect to, any property required to be included in the gross estate of a decedent under any federal tax law, the amount of the tax so paid, except in a case where a testator otherwise directs in the testator's will, shall be equitably prorated among the persons interested in the estate to whom such property is or may be transferred or to whom any benefit accrues. This proration shall be made by the personal representative in the proportion, as near as may be, that the value of the property, interest or benefit of each interested person bears to the total value of the property, interests and benefits received by all persons interested in the estate, except that in making the proration allowances shall be made for any exemptions granted by the law imposing the tax and for any deductions allowed by that law for the purpose of arriving at the value of the net estate; and, except that in cases where a trust is created, or other provision made by which any person is given an interest in income, or an estate for years, or for life, or only temporary interest in any property or fund, the tax on both the temporary interest and on the remainder thereafter shall be charged against and paid out of the corpus of the property or fund without apportionment between remainders and temporary estate.

So far as is practicable, and unless otherwise directed by the will of the decedent, the tax shall be paid by the personal representative, as such, out of the estate before its distribution. In all cases in which any property required to be included in the gross estate does not come into the possession of the personal representative, as such, the personal representative shall have the power and the duty, to recover from whomever is in possession, or from the persons interested in the estate, the proportionate amount of the tax, including interest, attorney fees and other costs of collection, payable by the persons interested in the estate with which the persons interested in the estate are chargeable under this section.

No personal representative, or other person acting in a fiduciary capacity, shall be required to transfer, pay over or distribute any fund or property with respect to which a federal estate or death tax is imposed until the amount of the tax or taxes due from the devisee, legatee, distributee or other person to whom that property is transferred is paid, or, if the apportionment of the tax has not been determined, adequate security is furnished by the transferee for this payment.

For a decedent dying before January 1, 2016, Tennessee estate or inheritance taxes, as the case may be, shall be prorated equitably among the beneficiaries and persons interested in the estate, except in a case where a testator otherwise directs in the testator's will, by the same method as described in subsections (a)-(d), except that the proration of the Tennessee tax shall be made in the proportion that the value of the property, interest or benefit of each beneficiary or interested person bears to the total value of the property, interests and benefits taxable in Tennessee and received by all persons interested in the estate. In making the proration, allowances shall be made for any exemptions granted by the Tennessee law imposing the tax and for any deductions allowed by that Tennessee law for the purpose of arriving at the value of the net estate. All definitions and rights or responsibilities of the personal representative applicable to the federal tax, as stated in subsections (a)-(d), shall be applicable to the determination of the prorated Tennessee tax payable by each beneficiary or person interested in the estate.

In the event the personal representative is unable to arrive at a satisfactory allocation of the tax, including interest, attorney fees and other costs of collection, among the beneficiaries and other persons interested in the estate as provided in subsections (b)-(e), the personal representative shall be authorized to file a petition in the probate court of the county in which the estate is being administered for the purpose of securing an adjudication with reference to the allocation. The probate court in such a case shall make a decree or order directing the personal representative to charge the prorated amounts against the persons against whom the tax, including interest, attorney fees and other costs of collection, has been so prorated, insofar as the personal representative is in possession of property or interests of such persons against whom the charge may be made, and summarily directing all other persons, against whom the tax, including interest, attorney fees and other costs of collection, has been prorated or who are in possession of property or interests of those persons, to make payment of the prorated amounts to the personal representative. The probate court of the county in which the estate is being administered shall have jurisdiction to entertain any proceeding or dispute under this section and to make disposition thereof. All such proceedings shall be maintained according to the forms of chancery.

Acts 1943, ch. 109, §§ 1, 2; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 8350.7, 8350.8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-1117, 30-1118; Acts 1984, ch. 609, §§ 1, 3; 2005, ch. 99, §§ 4, 5; 2017, ch. 290, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16 provided that section 3 of the act, which amended this section, should take effect January 1, 2017. However, since a public chapter cannot become effective on a date prior to becoming law, the code commission deems the amendment by that act to take effect on July 23, 2017, in accordance with Tenn. Const. art. II, § 20. See Opinion of the Attorney General, June 25, 1982 (OAG 82-191).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added “For a decedent dying before January 1, 2016,” at the beginning of the first sentence of (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16. July 23, 2017. See the Code Commission Notes.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 969, 986, 988.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, §§ 66, 67; 23 Tenn. Juris., Taxation, § 68.

Law Reviews.

Confused by tax reforms? Follow these 10 key rules for better estate planning in Tennessee (Dan W. Holbrook), 37 No. 8 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2001).

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

Some Whys and Wherefores of Will-Drafting — Revised (Robert L. McMurray), 15 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 2 (1979).

The Case of the Disappearing Inheritance Tax (Dan W. Holbrook), 36 No. 12 Tenn. B.J. 22 (2000).

Value definition clauses: The basics (Dan W. Holbrook), 37 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 33 (2001).

Wills, Estates and Trusts (William J. Bowe), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 1126 (1953).

Wills, Trusts and Estates — 1957 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 1238 (1957).

30-2-615. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 30-2-615 (Acts 1981, ch. 441, § 1; T.C.A., § 30-1119; Acts 1984, ch. 643, § 1), concerning statement of administration and distribution, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 1.